Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.195

Actions by and against code cities.

A code city may exercise the power to bring an action or special proceeding at law as authorized by Title 4 RCW, chapters 7.24, 7.25, and 6.27 RCW, and shall be subject to actions and process of law in accordance with procedures prescribed by law and rules of court.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1117; 1983 c 3 s 58; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.20.150. Formerly RCW 35A.20.150.]